data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX q   enir    inem-lhe       enir
SFX q   enir    inem-lhes      enir
SFX q   enir    inem-me        enir
SFX q   enir    inem-na        enir
SFX q   enir    inem-nas       enir
SFX q   enir    inem-no        enir
SFX q   enir    inem-nos       enir
SFX q   enir    inem-se        enir
SFX q   enir    inem-te        enir
SFX q   enir    inem-vos       enir
SFX q   enir    ino-a          enir
SFX q   enir    ino-as         enir
SFX q   enir    ino-lhe        enir
SFX q   enir    ino-lhes       enir
SFX q   enir    ino-me         enir
SFX q   enir    ino-o          enir
SFX q   enir    ino-os         enir
SFX q   enir    ino-te         enir
SFX q   enir    ino-vos        enir
SFX q   ir      e-a            elir
SFX q   ir      e-as           elir
SFX q   ir      e-lhe          elir
SFX q   ir      e-lhes         elir
SFX q   ir      e-me           elir
SFX q   ir      e-nos          elir
SFX q   ir      e-o            elir
SFX q   ir      e-os           elir
SFX q   ir      e-se           elir
SFX q   ir      e-te           elir
SFX q   ir      e-vos          elir
SFX q   ir      em-lhe         elir
SFX q   ir      em-lhes        elir
SFX q   ir      em-me          elir
SFX q   ir      em-na          elir
SFX q   ir      em-nas         elir
SFX q   ir      em-no          elir
SFX q   ir      em-nos         elir
SFX q   ir      em-se          elir
SFX q   ir      em-te          elir
SFX q   ir      em-vos         elir
SFX q   r       -la            elir
SFX q   r       -las           elir
SFX q   r       -lo            elir
SFX q   r       -los           elir
SFX q   r       -a             elir
SFX q   r       -as            elir
SFX q   r       -lhe           elir
SFX q   r       -lhes          elir
SFX q   r       -me            elir
SFX q   r       -nos           elir
SFX q   r       -o             elir
SFX q   r       -os            elir
SFX q   r       -se            elir
SFX q   r       -te            elir
SFX q   r       -vos           elir
SFX q   r       a-a            elir
SFX q   r       a-as           elir
SFX q   r       a-lhe          elir
SFX q   r       a-lhes         elir
SFX q   r       a-me           elir
SFX q   r       a-nos          elir
SFX q   r       a-o            elir
SFX q   r       a-os           elir
SFX q   r       a-se           elir
SFX q   r       a-te           elir
SFX q   r       a-vos          elir
SFX q   r       am-lhe         elir
SFX q   r       am-lhes        elir
SFX q   r       am-me          elir
SFX q   r       am-na          elir
SFX q   r       am-nas         elir
SFX q   r       am-no          elir
SFX q   r       am-nos         elir
SFX q   r       am-se          elir
SFX q   r       am-te          elir
SFX q   r       am-vos         elir
SFX q   ir      íamo-nos       elir
SFX q   ir      íamos-vos       elir
SFX q   ir      íamos-lhe      elir
SFX q   ir      íamos-lhes     elir
SFX q   ir      íamos-te       elir
SFX q   r       do-a           elir
SFX q   r       do-as          elir
SFX q   r       do-lhe         elir
SFX q   r       do-lhes        elir
SFX q   r       do-me          elir
SFX q   r       do-nos         elir
SFX q   r       do-o           elir
SFX q   r       do-os          elir
SFX q   r       do-se          elir
SFX q   r       do-te          elir
SFX q   r       do-vos         elir
SFX q   r       mo-nos         elir
SFX q   r       mos-vos         elir
SFX q   r       mos-lhe        elir
SFX q   r       mos-lhes       elir
SFX q   r       mos-te         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-a          elir
SFX q   r       ndo-as         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhe        elir
SFX q   r       ndo-lhes       elir
SFX q   r       ndo-me         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-nos        elir
SFX q   r       ndo-o          elir
SFX q   r       ndo-os         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-se         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-te         elir
SFX q   r       ndo-vos        elir
SFX q   0       a-a            elir
SFX q   0       a-as           elir
SFX q   0       a-lhe          elir
SFX q   0       a-lhes         elir
SFX q   0       a-me           elir
SFX q   0       a-nos          elir
SFX q   0       a-o            elir
SFX q   0       a-os           elir
SFX q   0       a-se           elir
SFX q   0       a-te           elir
SFX q   0       a-vos          elir
SFX q   0       -la-á          elir
SFX q   0       -las-á         elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-á         elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-á        elir
SFX q   0       -lo-á          elir
SFX q   0       -los-á         elir
SFX q   0       -me-á          elir
SFX q   0       -nos-á         elir
SFX q   0       -se-á          elir
SFX q   0       -te-á          elir
SFX q   0       -vos-á         elir
SFX q   0       am-lhe         elir
SFX q   0       am-lhes        elir
SFX q   0       am-me          elir
SFX q   0       am-na          elir
SFX q   0       am-nas         elir
SFX q   0       am-no          elir
SFX q   0       am-nos         elir
SFX q   0       am-se          elir
SFX q   0       am-te          elir
SFX q   0       am-vos         elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ão        elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ão       elir
SFX q   0       -me-ão         elir
SFX q   0       -na-ão         elir
SFX q   0       -nas-ão        elir
SFX q   0       -no-ão         elir
SFX q   0       -nos-ão        elir
SFX q   0       -se-ão         elir
SFX q   0       -te-ão         elir
SFX q   0       -vos-ão        elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ei        elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ei       elir
SFX q   0       -me-ei         elir
SFX q   0       -nos-ei        elir
SFX q   0       -se-ei         elir
SFX q   0       -te-ei         elir
SFX q   0       -vos-ei        elir
SFX q   0       em-lhe         elir
SFX q   0       em-lhes        elir
SFX q   0       em-me          elir
SFX q   0       em-na          elir
SFX q   0       em-nas         elir
SFX q   0       em-no          elir
SFX q   0       em-nos         elir
SFX q   0       em-se          elir
SFX q   0       em-te          elir
SFX q   0       em-vos         elir
SFX q   0       -la-emos       elir
SFX q   0       -las-emos      elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-emos      elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-emos     elir
SFX q   0       -lo-emos       elir
SFX q   0       -los-emos      elir
SFX q   0       -nos-emos      elir
SFX q   0       -te-emos       elir
SFX q   0       -vos-emos      elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-ia        elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-ia       elir
SFX q   0       -me-ia         elir
SFX q   0       -nos-ia        elir
SFX q   0       -se-ia         elir
SFX q   0       -te-ia         elir
SFX q   0       -vos-ia        elir
SFX q   0       -lhe-iam       elir
SFX q   0       -lhes-iam      elir
SFX q   0       -me-iam        elir
SFX q   0       -nos-iam       elir
SFX q   0       -se-iam        elir
SFX q   0       -te-iam        elir
SFX q   0       -vos-iam       elir
SFX q   0       íamo-nos       elir
SFX q   0       íamos-vos       elir
SFX q   0       íamos-lhe      elir
SFX q   0       íamos-lhes     elir
SFX q   0       íamos-te       elir
SFX q   0       mo-nos         elir
SFX q   0       mos-vos         elir
SFX q   0       mos-lhe        elir
SFX q   0       mos-lhes       elir
SFX q   0       mos-te         elir
SFX q   r       sse-a          elir
SFX q   r       sse-as         elir
SFX q   r       sse-lhe        elir
SFX q   r       sse-lhes       elir
SFX q   r       sse-me         elir
SFX q   r       sse-nos        elir
SFX q   r       sse-o          elir
SFX q   r       sse-os         elir
SFX q   r       sse-se         elir
SFX q   r       sse-te         elir
SFX q   r       sse-vos        elir
SFX q   r       ssem-lhe       elir
SFX q   r       ssem-lhes      elir
SFX q   r       ssem-me        elir
SFX q   r       ssem-na        elir
SFX q   r       ssem-nas       elir
SFX q   r       ssem-no        elir
SFX q   r       ssem-nos       elir
SFX q   r       ssem-te        elir
SFX q   r       ssem-vos       elir
SFX q   r       ste-a          elir
SFX q   r       ste-as         elir
