data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
abolir/gqMj
amarelir/gqMjL
arguir/gqj
compelir/gqMjL
convelir/gqMjL
delir/gqMjL
demolir/gqMjÃÀ
emolir/gqMj
excelir/gqMjL
expelir/gqMjL
impelir/gqMjL
prevenir/gqMjÂ
propelir/gqMjLÃ
prover/gqMbjÂÀ
redarguir/gqj
repelir/gqMjL
revelir/gqMjL
tossir/gqMj
